sk-SK: Dizajn hrotu: Hrot katétra; Excentrický hrot; Luerov zámok; Sklzový hrot; Iné
zh-CN: 尖端设计: 导管尖端; 偏头尖端; 鲁尔锁; 滑尖; 其他
pt-PT: Design de ponta: Ponta de cateter; Ponta excêntrica; Luer lock; Ponta deslizante; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik vrha: Vrh katetera; Ekscentrični vrh; Luer lock; Klizni vrh; Ostalo
el: Σχέδιο άκρου (μύτης): Ρύγχος καθετήρα; Εκκεντρική άκρη; Κλειδαριά Luer; Μύτη ολίσθησης; Άλλο
es: Diseño de la punta: Punta de catéter; Punta excéntrica; Cierre Luer; Punta deslizante; Otros
vi: Thiết kế đầu: Đầu ống thông; Đầu lệch tâm; Khóa luer; Đầu trượt; Khác
cs: Design koncovky/jehly/špičky: Špička katétru; Excentrická špička; Zámek Luer; Kluzná špička; Jiné
da: Spidsesign: Kateterspids; Excentrisk spids; Luer-lås; Slip-spids; Andet
ru: Вид наконечника: Наконечник катетера; Эксцентриковый наконечник; Замок Люэра; Скользящий наконечник; Другой
tr: Uç Tasarımı: Kateter ucu; Eksantrik; Luer kilidi; Slip uç; Diğer
sv: Spetsdesign: Kateterspets; Excentrisk spets; Luer-lås; Slipspets; Övrigt
zh-TW: 尖端設計: 導管尖端; 側直頭; 氣密式; 直插頭; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova konice: Katetrska konica; Zamaknjena konica; Luer lock; Drsna konica; Drugo
lt-LT: Antgalio dizainas: Kateterio antgalis; Šoninis antgalis; Luerio jungtis; Užmaunamas antgalis; Kita
en: Tip design: Catheter tip; Eccentric tip; Luer lock; Slip tip; Other
pl: Projekt końcówki: Końcówka cewnika; Końcówka mimośrodowa; Zamek Luera; Końcówka antypoślizgowa; Inne
pt-BR: Design da ponta: Ponta do cateter; Ponta excêntrica; Fechadura Luer; Ponta deslizante; Outro
it: Forma della punta: Punta del catetere; Punta eccentrica; Luerlock; Punta scorrevole; Altro
ro-RO: Design vârf: Vârf cateter; Vârf excentric; Luer lock; Vârf glisant; Altele
th: การออกแบบส่วนปลาย: ปลายสายสวน; หัวด้านข้าง; หัวเกลียว; หัวธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на върха: Накрайник на катетър; Ексцентричен накрайник; Луер заключване; Плъзгащ се накрайник; Други
hu: Hegy kialakítása: Katéterhegy; Excentrikus hegy; Luer zár; Csúszóhegy; Egyéb
ja: 先端形状: カテーテルチップ; エキセントリックチップ; ルアーロック; スリップチップ; その他
nl: Tipontwerp: Kathetertip; Excentrische punt; Luer-slot; Slip tip; Andere
ko: 팁 디자인: 카테터 팁; 편심 팁; 루어 락; 슬립 팁; 기타
nb: Tuppdesign: Kateterspiss; Eksentrisk spiss; Luer-lås; Glidespiss; Annet
fr: Design de la pointe: Embout du cathéter; Pointe excentrique; Seringue; Pointe glissante; Autre
fi: Kärjen muotoilu: Katetrikärki; Eksentrinen kärki; Luer-lukko; Liukukärki; Muu
de: Spitzendesign: Katheterspitze; Exzentrische Spitze; Luer-Lock; Rutschfeste Spitze; Sonstiges